Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7610
Assessments authorized.

If the assets of, and stop-loss insurance policy issued to, a multiple employer welfare arrangement are at any time insufficient to pay claims made against a health benefit plan, discharge liabilities and obligations relating to health benefit plan claims, and maintain adequate reserves and surpluses, the board of trustees shall be authorized to assess the participating employers in an amount necessary to remedy the deficiency.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 10.